New York, session 2025-2026, A6969.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 344-r to 2 read as follows: 3 § 344-r. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to Main- 4 tenance Supervisor Stephen C. Ebling. The bridge on Eden Evans Center 5 Road, in the town of Evans, county of Erie, crossing over the New York 6 state thruway, shall be dedicated to Maintenance Supervisor Stephen C. 7 Ebling. 8 § 2. The chair of the New York state thruway authority shall provide 9 for the installation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state 10 highway system as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, 11 provided that such signing shall state "Bridge Dedicated to Maintenance 12 Supervisor Stephen C Ebling". However, to avoid confusion and to limit 13 any possible disruption of commerce, the dedication called for pursuant 14 to section one of this act shall be one of ceremonial nature and the 15 official name of such bridge shall not be changed as a result of this 16 act. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10357-08-5